Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB971.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3353(a)(1) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:§ 3353. Prohibitions in specified places.(a) General rule.--Except when necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic or to protect the safety of any person or vehicle or in compliance with law or the directions of a police officer or official traffic-control device, no person shall:(1) Stop, stand or park a vehicle:* * *(xi) Upon any lane designed for pedalcycles. A vehicle may temporarily stop on a pedalcycle lane to avoid an emergency vehicle.123456789101112131415161718 * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0971PN1054 - 2 - 12